Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.660

Emergency storage situation—Forwarding to other warehouses.

Upon determining that an emergency storage situation appears to exist, the director may authorize the warehouse operator to forward grain that is covered by negotiable receipts to other licensed warehouses for storage without canceling and reissuing the negotiable receipts pursuant to conditions established by rule.

[ 2011 c 336 s 643; 2003 c 13 s 1; 1983 c 305 s 64.]

NOTES:

Severability—1983 c 305: See note following RCW 20.01.010.